Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB510.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 706(a)(5) of the act of July 10, 1987 (P.L.246, No.47), known as the Municipalities Financial Recovery Act, is amended to read:Section 706. Powers, duties and prohibited actions.(a) Powers and duties.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the receiver shall have the following powers and duties:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (5) To require the distressed municipality or authority to cause the sale, lease, conveyance, assignment or other use or disposition of the distressed municipality's or authority's assets in accordance with section 707. If the sale, lease, conveyance, assignment or other use or disposition under this paragraph relates to a water or wastewater system, the receiver shall contact the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission, and the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission shall complete an analysis and submit the analysis to the receiver and municipality within 90 days after the contact. If the analysis determines that the sale, lease, conveyance, assignment or other use or disposition would result in a 25% increase in the monthly average residential ratepayers bill, the receiver may not proceed with the sale, lease, conveyance, assignment or other use or disposition.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0510PN0492 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718